North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 21. The North Carolina Study Commission on Aging. [Repealed]

§§ 120-180 through 120-188.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.6, effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-180; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-181; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-182; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; 1991, c. 739, s. 18; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2009-142, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-183; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; 1991, c. 739, s. 19; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-184; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-185; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(a), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-186; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-186.1; 1989, c. 368, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 583, s. 1; 1999-76, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-187; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-188; 1987, c. 873, s. 13.1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§§ 120-189 through 120-194.

Reserved for future codification purposes.